Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1777
Accounting for interest and dividend expenses.

A credit union shall accrue, as an expense on a monthly basis, all dividends on any type of share account whether or not the rates involved have been specified or contracted for in advance. This section shall not be interpreted to permit a credit union to pay a dividend, except as provided in section 21-1776. Reasonable estimates may be used for the expense accrual required by this section except at the end of a dividend period.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 77.